en: E905e, Mineral oil medium viscosity
xx: E905e
bg: E905e, Средновискозитно минерално масло
cs: E905e, Minerální olej střední viskozity
da: E905e, Mineralolie med medium viskositet
de: E905e, Mineralöl mittlere Viskosität
el: E905e, Μέσης ιξώδους ορυκτό έλαιο
es: E905e, Aceite mineral de viscosidad media
et: E905e, Keskmise viskoossusega mineraalõli
fi: E905e, Keskitiheyksinen mineraaliöljy
fr: E905e, Huile minérale de viscosité moyenne
hu: E905e, Közepes viszkozitású ásványi olaj
it: E905e, Olio minerale a viscosità media
lt: E905e, Vidutinės klampumo mineralinė alyva
lv: E905e, Vidējas viskozitātes minerālais eļļa
mt: E905e, Xibka ta' viskożità medja tal-ħalib
nl: E905e, Minerale olie met medium viscositeit
pl: E905e, Olej mineralny o średniej lepkości
pt: E905e, Óleo mineral de viscosidade média
ro: E905e, Ulei mineral cu vâscozitate medie
sk: E905e, Minerálny olej strednej viskozity
sl: E905e, Mineralno olje srednje viskoznosti
sv: E905e, Mineralolja med medelhög viskositet

en: E905f, Mineral oil medium and low viscosity class II
xx: E905f
bg: E905f, Минерално масло със средна и ниска вискозитетна клас II
cs: E905f, Minerální olej střední a nízké viskozity třída II
da: E905f, Mineralolie med medium og lav viskositet klasse II
de: E905f, Mineralöl mittlere und niedrige Viskosität Klasse II
el: E905f, Ορυκτό έλαιο με μέτρια και χαμηλή ιξώδες κλάση II
es: E905f, Aceite mineral de viscosidad media y baja clase II
et: E905f, Keskmise ja madala viskoossusega mineraalõli klass II
fi: E905f, Keskiviskositeettinen ja matalaviskositeettinen mineraaliöljy luokka II
fr: E905f, Huile minérale de viscosité moyenne et faible classe II
hu: E905f, Közepes és alacsony viszkozitású ásványi olaj II. osztály
it: E905f, Olio minerale a viscosità media e bassa classe II
lt: E905f, Vidutinės ir mažos klampumo mineralinė alyva II klasė
lv: E905f, Vidējas un zemas viskozitātes minerālais eļļa II klase
mt: E905f, Xibka ta' viskożità medja u baxxa tal-ħalib klassi II
nl: E905f, Minerale olie met medium en lage viscositeit klasse II
pl: E905f, Olej mineralny o średniej i niskiej lepkości klasy II
pt: E905f, Óleo mineral de viscosidade média e baixa classe II
ro: E905f, Ulei mineral cu vâscozitate medie și scăzută clasă II
sk: E905f, Minerálny olej strednej a nízkej viskozity trieda II
sl: E905f, Mineralno olje srednje in nizke viskoznosti razred II
sv: E905f, Mineralolja med medelhög och låg viskositet klass II

en: E905g, Mineral oil medium and low viscosity class III
xx: E905g
bg: E905g, Минерално масло средна и ниска вискозитетна клас III
cs: E905g, Minerální olej střední a nízké viskozity třída III
da: E905g, Mineralolie med medium og lav viskositet klasse III
de: E905g, Mineralöl mittlere und niedrige Viskosität Klasse III
el: E905g, Ορυκτό έλαιο με μέτρια και χαμηλή ιξώδες κλάση III
es: E905g, Aceite mineral de viscosidad media y baja clase III
et: E905g, Keskmise ja madala viskoossusega mineraalõli klass III
fi: E905g, Keskiviskositeettinen ja matalaviskositeettinen mineraaliöljy luokka III
fr: E905g, Huile minérale de viscosité moyenne et faible classe III
hu: E905g, Közepes és alacsony viszkozitású ásványi olaj III. osztály
it: E905g, Olio minerale a viscosità media e bassa classe III
lt: E905g, Vidutinės ir mažos klampumo mineralinė alyva III klasė
lv: E905g, Vidējas un zemas viskozitātes minerālais eļļa III klase
mt: E905g, Xibka ta' viskożità medja u baxxa tal-ħalib klassi III
nl: E905g, Minerale olie met medium en lage viscositeit klasse III
pl: E905g, Olej mineralny o średniej i niskiej lepkości klasy III
pt: E905g, Óleo mineral de viscosidade média e baixa classe III
ro: E905g, Ulei mineral cu vâscozitate medie și scăzută clasă III
sk: E905g, Minerálny olej strednej a nízkej viskozity trieda III
sl: E905g, Mineralno olje srednje in nizke viskoznosti razred III
sv: E905g, Mineralolja med medelhög och låg viskositet klass III

en: E906, Benzoin resin
xx: E906
af: E906, Bensoëhars
ar: E906, صمغ بنزوين
az: E906, Benzin qətranı
bg: E906, Бензое смола
ca: E906, Resina de benjuí
cs: E906, Benzoe, Pryskyřice benzoe, Guma benzoe
da: E906, Benzoinharpiks
de: E906, Benzoe, Benzoeharz
el: E906, Ρητίνη βενζόης
eo: E906, Benzoina rezino
es: E906, Resina de benjuí
et: E906, Bensoe vaik
fi: E906, Bentsoiinikumi, Bentsoiinikumia
fr: E906, Gomme benzoïque, Gomme benjoin, Gomme de benjoin, gum storax, gum benzoin, gum benjamin, Benjoin, Storax
he: E906, שרף בנזואין
hi: E906, बेंजोइन राल
hr: E906, Benzoin smola
hu: E906, Benzoeviasz
id: E906, Damar benzoin
it: E906, Resina di benzoino, Gomma di benzoino
ja: E906, 安息香樹脂
ko: E906, 안식향 수지
lt: E906, Benzoinė derva
lv: E906, Benzoīna sveķi
mk: E906, Бензоин смола
ms: E906, Resin benzoin
mt: E906, Raża tal-benżoin
nl: E906, Benzoïnegum, Benzoë
pl: E906, Styraks, Benzoin, benzoë
pt: E906, Resina de benzoim
ro: E906, Gumă de benzoia
ru: E906, Бензойная смола
sk: E906, Benzoínová živica
sl: E906, Benzoinska smola
sq: E906, Rrëshirë benzoine
sr: E906, Бензоин смола
sv: E906, Bensoeharts
th: E906, เรซินเบนโซอิน
tr: E906, Benzoil reçinesi
uk: E906, Бензойна смола
vi: E906, Nhựa benzoin
zh: E906, 安息香树脂

en: E907, Hydrogenated poly-1-decene, Hydrogenated polydec-1-ene, Crystalline wax
xx: E907
bg: E907, Хидрогениран поли-1-децен, Хидрогениран полидец-1-ен
ca: E907, Poli-1-decè hidrogenat
cs: E907, Hydrogenovaný poly-1-decen, Hydrogenovaný poly(dec-1-en)
da: E907, Hydrogeneret poly-1-decen, Hydrogeneret polydec-1-en
de: E907, Hydriertes poly-1-decen, hydriertes Polydec-1-en
el: E907, Υδρογονωμενο πολυ-1-δεκενιο, Υδρογονωμένο πολυδεκένιο-1
es: E907, Poli-1-deceno hidrogenado, Polidec-1-eno hidrogenado
et: E907, Hüdrogeenitud polü-1-detseen, Hüdrogeenitud polü-α-olefiin
fi: E907, Vetykäsitelty poly-1-dekeeni, Vetykäsitelty polydek-1-eeni, Puhdistettu mikrokiteinen vaha, Vetykäsiteltyä poly-1-dekeeniä, Vetykäsiteltyä polydek-1-eeniä, Puhdistettua mikrokiteistä vahaa
fr: E907, Poly-1-décène hydrogéné, Polydéc-1-ène hydrogéné
hu: E907, Hidrogénezett poli-1-decén, Hidrogénezett polidec-1-én
it: E907, Poli-1-decene idrogenato, Polidec-1-ene idrogenato
lt: E907, Hidrintas poli(1-decenas), Hidrintas poli(1-decenas)
lv: E907, Hidrogenēts poli-1-decēns, Hidrogenēts polidec-1-ēns
mt: E907, Poli-1-deċen idroġinata, Polideċ-1-en idroġenat
nl: E907, Gehydrogeneerd poly-1-deceen, Gehydrogeneerd polydec-1-een
pl: E907, Uwodorniony poli-1-deken, Uwodorniony poli-1-deken
pt: E907, Poli-1-deceno hidrogenado, Polidec-1-eno hidrogenado
ro: E907, Poli-1-decenă hidrogenată, Polidec-1-enă hidrogenată
sk: E907, Hydrogenovaný poly-1-decén, Hydrogenovaný polydec-1-én
sl: E907, Hidrogenirani poli-1-decen, hidrogenirani polidec-1-en
sv: E907, Hydrogenerat poly-1-deken, Hydrogenerat polydek-1-en

en: E908, Rice bran wax
xx: E908
ar: E908, شمع نخالة الأرز
az: E908, Düyü kəpəyi mumu
bg: E908, Восък от оризови трици
ca: E908, Cera de segó d'arròs
cs: E908, Vosk z rýžových otrub
da: E908, Risklidvoks
de: E908, Reiskleiewachs
el: E908, Κερί πίτουρου ρυζιού
es: E908, Cera de salvado de arroz
et: E908, Riisikliivaha
fi: E908, Riisilesevaha, Riisilesevahaa
fr: E908, Cire de son de riz
hu: E908, Arrosviasz
it: E908, Cera di crusca di riso
ja: E908, 米ぬかワックス
ko: E908, 쌀겨 왁스
lt: E908, Ryžių sėlenų vaškas
lv: E908, Rīsu kliju vasks
nl: E908, Riijstkorrelwas
pl: E908, Wosk z otrębów ryżowych
pt: E908, Cera de farelo de arroz
ro: E908, Ceară de tărâțe dde orez
ru: E908, Воск рисовых отрубей
sk: E908, Vosk z ryžových otrúb
sl: E908, Vosek riževih otrobov
sv: E908, Risklivax
th: E908, ขี้ผึ้งรำข้าว
tr: E908, Pirinç kepeği mumu
uk: E908, Віск рисових висівок
zh: E908, 米糠蜡

en: E909, Spermaceti
xx: E909
af: E909, Spermasetie
ar: E909, إسبرماسيتي
az: E909, Spermaceti
bg: E909, Спермацет
ca: E909, Espermaceti
cs: E909, Vorvaňovina
da: E909, Spermacetolie
de: E909, Walrat
el: E909, Σπερματσέτι
eo: E909, Spermaceto
es: E909, Espermaceti
et: E909, Spermacet
eu: E909, Espermati
fa: E909, اسپرم‌نهنگ
fi: E909, Valaanpäävaha, Valaanpäävahaa
fr: E909, Cire de blanc de baleine, Spermaceti
gl: E909, Espermacete
he: E909, סְפֶּרמָצֶטִי
hi: E909, स्परमासेटी
hr: E909, Spermaceti
hu: E909, Szpermacet
id: E909, Spermaceti
is: E909, Sæðishvalalýsi
it: E909, Spermaceti
ja: E909, 鯨蝋
ka: E909, სპერმაცეტი
ko: E909, 고래 기름
lt: E909, Spermacetas
lv: E909, Spermacets
mk: E909, Спермацети
ms: E909, Spermaceti
mt: E909, Spermaceti
nl: E909, Walschot
pl: E909, Spermacet
pt: E909, Espermacete
ro: E909, Ceară de spermaceti
ru: E909, Спермацет
sk: E909, Vorvaňovina
sl: E909, Spermaceti
sq: E909, Spermaceti
sr: E909, Спермацети
sv: E909, Valrav
th: E909, สเปิร์มมาเซติ
tr: E909, Spermaceti
uk: E909, Спермацет
ur: E909, سپرمیسیٹی
vi: E909, Spermaceti
zh: E909, 鲸蜡

en: E910, Wax ester
xx: E910
bg: E910, Восъчен естер
cs: E910, Voskový ester
da: E910, Voksester
de: E910, Wachsester
el: E910, Εστέρας κεριού
es: E910, Éster de cera
et: E910, Vahaester
fi: E910, Vahaesteri, Vahaesteriä
fr: E910, Esters de cires, Esters de cire
hu: E910, Viaszészter
it: E910, Esteri di cera
lt: E910, Vaško esteris
lv: E910, Vaska esters
mt: E910, Ester tal-vaża
nl: E910, Wasester
pl: E910, Ester woskowy
pt: E910, Éster de cera
ro: E910, Esteri de ceară, Ester de ceară
sk: E910, Voskový ester
sl: E910, Vosek ester
sv: E910, Vaxester

en: E911, Fatty acid methyl ester
xx: E911
bg: E911, Метилов естер на мастни киселини
cs: E911, Methyl ester mastných kyselin
da: E911, Methyl ester af fedtsyrer
de: E911, Fettsäuremethylester
el: E911, Μεθυλικός εστέρας λιπαρών οξέων
es: E911, Éster metílico de ácidos grasos
et: E911, Rasvhapete metüülester
fi: E911, Rasvahappojen metyyliesterit, Rasvahappojen metyyliestereitä
fr: E911, Esters méthyliques d'acides gras
hu: E911, Zsírsav-metil-észter, Zsírsav metilészter
it: E911, Esteri metilici degli acidi grassi
lt: E911, Riebalų rūgščių metilesteriai
lv: E911, Taukskābju metilesteri
mt: E911, Ester metiliku tal-akidi grassi
nl: E911, Methyl ester van vetzuren
pl: E911, Estry metylowe kwasów tłuszczowych
pt: E911, Éster metílico de ácidos gordos
ro: E911, Metil esteri ai acizilor grași, Ester metilic al acizilor grași
sk: E911, Metyl ester mastných kyselín
sl: E911, Metilni estri maščobnih kislin
sv: E911, Fettsyrametylestrar

en: E912, Montanic acid esters, Montan acid esters
xx: E912
bg: E912, Естери на монтановата киселина
ca: E912, Èster d'àcid montànic, ester d'acid montanic
cs: E912, Montan acid esters
da: E912, Montansyreestere
de: E912, Montansäureester
el: E912, Εστερες του μοντανικου οξεος
es: E912, Ésteres de ácido montánico
et: E912, Montaanhappe estrid
fi: E912, Montaanahapon esterit, Montaanahapon estereitä
fr: E912, Ester de l'acide montanique, Esters de l'acide montanique
hu: E912, Montánsav-észterek, Montánsavak
it: E912, Esteri dell'acido montanico
lt: E912, Montano rūgšties esteriai
lv: E912, Montānskābes esteri
mt: E912, Esteri tal-aċidu montaniku
nl: E912, Esters van montaanzuur
pl: E912, Estry kwasu montanowego
pt: E912, Ésteres do ácido montânico
ro: E912, Esteri ai acidului montanic
sk: E912, Estery kyseliny montánovej
sl: E912, Estri montanske kisline
sv: E912, Montansyraestrar

en: E913, Lanolin, sheep wool grease, wool wax, wool grease
af: E913, Lanolien
ar: E913, اللانولين
az: E913, Lanolin
bg: E913, Ланолин
ca: E913, Lanolina
cs: E913, Lanolin, Adeps Lanae
da: E913, Lanolin
de: E913, Wollwachs, Adeps lanae, Wollwachsalkohole, Wollfett, Lanolin
el: E913, Λανολίνη
eo: E913, Lanolino
es: E913, Lanolina
et: E913, Lanolin
eu: E913, Lanolina
fa: E913, لانولین
fi: E913, Lanoliini, Lampaanvillarasva, Adeps, Lanoliinia, Lampaanvillarasvaa
fr: E913, Lanoline, 8006-54-0
ga: E913, Lanólin
gl: E913, Lanolina
he: E913, לנולין
hi: E913, लैनोलिन
hr: E913, Lanolin
hu: E913, Lanolin, gyapjúzsír
hy: E913, Լանոլին
id: E913, Lanolin
is: E913, Lanolín
it: E913, Lanolina, Esipo
ja: E913, ラノリン
ka: E913, ლანოლინი
ko: E913, 라놀린
lt: E913, Lanolinas
lv: E913, Lanolīns
mk: E913, Ланолин
ms: E913, Lanolin
mt: E913, Lanolin
nl: E913, Lanoline, Wolvet
no: E913, Lanolin
pl: E913, Lanolina
pt: E913, Lanolina
ro: E913, Lanolină
ru: E913, Ланолин
sk: E913, Lanolín
sl: E913, Lanolin
sq: E913, Lanolinë
sr: E913, Ланолин
sv: E913, Lanolin, Adeps lanæ, E 913
ta: E913, லானோலின்
th: E913, ลาโนลิน
tr: E913, Lanolin
uk: E913, Ланолін
ur: E913, لانولین
vi: E913, Lanolin
zh: E913, 羊毛脂

en: E914, Oxidised polyethylene wax
xx: E914
af: E914, Oksiderende poliëtileenwas
ar: E914, شمع البولي إيثيلين المؤكسد
az: E914, Oksidləşmiş polietilen mumu
bg: E914, Окислен полиетиленов восък
ca: E914, Cera de polietilè oxidada
cs: E914, Oxidovaný polyethylenový vosk
da: E914, Oxideret polyethylenvoks
de: E914, Polyethylenwachs-oxidate
el: E914, Κηρός οξειδωμένων πολυαιθυλενιων
eo: E914, Oksigenita polietilena vakso
es: E914, Cera de polietileno oxidada
et: E914, Oksüdeeritud polüetüleenvaha
fi: E914, Hapetettu polyeteenivaha
fr: E914, Cire de polyéthylène oxydée
gl: E914, Cera de polietileno oxidada
he: E914, שעוות פוליאתילן מחומצנת
hi: E914, ऑक्सीकृत पॉलीथीन मोम
hr: E914, Oksidirani polietilenski vosak
hu: E914, Oxidált polietilénviasz
id: E914, Lilin polietilena teroksidasi
it: E914, Cera polietilenica ossidata
ja: E914, 酸化ポリエチレンワックス
ko: E914, 산화 폴리에틸렌 왁스
lt: E914, Oksiduotas polietileno vaškas
lv: E914, Oksidēti polietilēnsveķi
mk: E914, Оксидиран полиетиленски восок
mt: E914, Xama' tal-polietilen ossidat
nl: E914, Geoxideerde polyethyleenwas
pl: E914, Wosk polietylenowy utleniony
pt: E914, Cera de polietileno oxidada
ro: E914, Ceară polietilenică oxidată
ru: E914, Окисленный полиэтиленовый воск
sk: E914, Oxidovaný polyetylénový vosk
sl: E914, Oksidiran polietilenski vosek
sq: E914, Dyllë polietileni i oksiduar
sr: E914, Оксидовани полиетиленски восак
sv: E914, Oxiderat polyetylenvax
th: E914, ขี้ผึ้งโพลีเอทิลีนออกซิไดซ์
tr: E914, Oksitlenmiş polietilen mumu
uk: E914, Окислений поліетиленовий віск
vi: Sáp polyetylen oxy hóa
zh: 氧化聚乙烯蜡

en: E915, Esters of Colophane, Esters of colophony
xx: E915
bg: E915, Естери на колофонията, Естери на колофония
cs: E915, Estery kolofonu, Estery kolofonie
da: E915, Estere af colophane, Estere af colophony
de: E915, Kolophanester, Kolophonyester
el: E915, Εστέρες της κολοφωνίας, Εστέρες της κολοφωνίας
es: E915, Ésteres de colofonia, Ésteres de colofonia
et: E915, Kolofooni estrid, Kolofooni estrid
fi: E915, Kolofaanin esterit, Kolofaanin estereitä
fr: E915, Esters de colophane, Esters de colophony
hu: E915, Kolofán-észter, Kolofánészterek, Kolofánészterek
it: E915, Esteri di colofonia, Esteri di colofonia
lt: E915, Kolofonio esteriai, Kolofonio esteriai
lv: E915, Kolofonija esteri, Kolofonija esteri
mt: E915, Estri tal-kolofonja, Estri tal-kolofonja
nl: E915, Esters van colofonium, Esters van colofonium
pl: E915, Estry kolofonii, Estry kolofonii
pt: E915, Ésteres de colofónia, Ésteres de colofónia
ro: E915, Esterii colofoniului, Esteri de colofoniu, Esteri de colofonie
sk: E915, Estery kolofónu, Estery kolofónie
sl: E915, Esteri kolofona, Esteri kolofona
sv: E915, Estrar av kolofonium, Estrar av kolofoni

en: E916, Calcium iodate
xx: E916, 3b202
bg: E916, Калциев йодат
cs: E916, Jodan vápenatý
da: E916, Calciumiodat
de: E916, Calciumiodat
el: E916, Ιωδικό ασβέστιο
es: E916, Yodato de calcio
et: E916, Kaltsiumjodaat
fi: E916, Kalsiumjodaatti, Kalsiumjodaattia
fr: E916, Iodate de calcium
hu: E916, Kalcium-jodát
it: E916, Iodato di calcio
lt: E916, Kalcio jodatas
lv: E916, Kalcija jodāts
mt: E916, Jodat tal-kalċju
nl: E916, Calciumjodaat
pl: E916, Jodan wapnia
pt: E916, Iodato de cálcio
ro: E916, Iodat de calciu
sk: E916, Jodan vápenatý
sl: E916, Kalcijev jodat
sv: E916, Kalciumjodat

en: E917, potassium iodate
xx: E917
ar: E917, يودات البوتاسيوم
bg: E917, Калиев йодат
ca: E917, iodat de potassi
cs: E917, jodičnan draselný, Jodečnan draselný
de: E917, Kaliumiodat, Kaliumjodat
el: E917, ιωδικό κάλιο
eo: E917, kalia jodato
es: E917, yodato de potasio, Yodato potásico
et: E917, kaaliumjodaat
fa: E917, پتاسیم یدات
fi: E917, Kaliumjodaatti, Kaliumjodaattia
fr: E917, Iodate de potassium
hr: E917, kalijev jodat, KIO3, kalij jodat
hu: E917, Kálium-jodát
id: E917, Kalium iodat
it: E917, Iodato di potassio
ja: E917, ヨウ素酸カリウム
lt: E917, kalio jodatas
lv: E917, kālija jodāts
mt: E917, jodat tal-potassju
nl: E917, Kaliumjodaat
pl: E917, Jodan potasu, Jodan-V potasu
pt: E917, Iodato de potássio
ro: E917, Iodat de potasiu
ru: E917, иодат калия
sh: E917, Kalijum jodat
sk: E917, jodičnan draselný
sl: E917, kalijev jodat
sr: E917, Kalijum jodat
sv: E917, kaliumjodat
ta: E917, பொட்டாசியம் அயோடேட்டு|
tr: E917, Potasyum iyodat
uk: E917, Йодат калію
vi: E917, Kali iodat
zh: E917, 碘酸钾

en: E918, Nitrogen oxides
xx: E918
bg: E918, Азотни оксиди
cs: E918, Oxidy dusíku
da: E918, Nitrogenoxider
de: E918, Stickoxide
el: E918, Οξείδια του αζώτου
es: E918, Óxidos de nitrógeno
et: E918, Lämmastikoksiidid
fi: E918, Typpioksidit, Typpioksideja
fr: E918, Oxydes d'azote
hu: E918, Nitrogén-oxidok
it: E918, Ossidi di azoto
lt: E918, Azoto oksidai
lv: E918, Slāpekļa oksīdi
mt: E918, Ossidu tal-nitroġenu
nl: E918, Stikstofoxiden
pl: E918, Tlenki azotu
pt: E918, Óxidos de nitrogênio
ro: E918, Oxizi de azot
sk: E918, Oxidy dusíka
sl: E918, Dušikovi oksidi
sv: E918, Kväveoxider

en: E919, Nitrosyl chloride
xx: E919
ar: E919, كلوريد النيتروسيل
az: E919, Nitrozil xlorid
bg: E919, Нитрозилов хлорид
ca: E919, Clorur de nitrosil
cs: E919, Chlorid nitrosylu
da: E919, Nitrosylchlorid
de: E919, Nitrosylchlorid, NOCl
el: E919, Χλωριούχο νιτροσύλιο
eo: E919, Nitrozila klorido
es: E919, Cloruro de nitrosilo
et: E919, Nitrosüülkloriid
fi: E919, Nitrosyylikloridi, Nitrosyylikloridia
fr: E919, Chlorure de nitrosyle, Oxychlorure d'azote, ClNO, NOCl
hu: E919, nitrozil-klorid
it: E919, cloruro di nitrosile
ja: E919, 塩化ニトロシル
ko: E919, 니트로 실 염화물
lt: E919, Nitrozilo chloridas
lv: E919, Nitrozilhlorīds
mk: E919, Нитрозил хлорид
nl: E919, Nitrosylchloride
pl: E919, Chlorek nitrozylu, Nocl
pt: E919, Cloreto de nitrosilo
ro: E919, Clorură de nitrozil
ru: E919, Хлорид нитрозила
sk: E919, Nitrozylchlorid
sl: E919, Nitrozil klorid
sq: E919, Klorur nitrozil
sv: E919, Nitrosylklorid, Nitrosoniumklorid, Kväveoxyklorid
tr: E919, Nitrozil klorür
uk: E919, Нітрозилхлорид
zh: E919, 氯化亚硝酰

en: E920, l-cysteine, L-cysteine hydrochloride, L-Cysteine, L-2-Amino-3-mercaptopropionic acid, L-Cys, (R)-2-Amino-3-mercaptopropanoic acid, (2R)-2-amino-3-sulfanylpropanoic acid, (2R)-2-amino-3-mercaptopropanoic acid
xx: E920
bg: E920, L-цистеин, цистеин
bs: E920, L-cisteina
ca: E920, L-cisteïna, L-cisteina
cs: E920, L-cystein, Cystein
da: E920, L-cystein, Cystein
de: E920, L-cystein, Cystein, D-Cystein, Cysteinhydrochlorid-Monohydrat, Zystein
el: E920, L-κυστεϊνη, Κυστεΐνη
es: E920, L-cisteína, Cisteína
et: E920, L-tsüsteiin
eu: E920, L-Zisteina
fi: E920, L-kysteiini, Kysteiini, L-kysteiiniä, Kysteiiniä
fr: E920, L-Cystéine et ses chlorhydrates, L-Cystéine, Cystéine, C3H7NO2S
gl: E920, L-Cisteína
hr: E920, L-cistein
hu: E920, L-cisztein, Cisztein
hy: E920, L-ցիստեին
it: E920, L-cisteina, cisteina, C3H7NO2S, Cisteine, Acido α-ammino-β-mercaptopropionico
ja: E920, L-システイン
lt: E920, L-cisteinas, Cisteinas
lv: E920, L cisteīns, Cisteīns, C3h7no2s
mt: E920, L-ċisteina
nl: E920, L-cysteïne, cysteïne
nn: E920, L-cystein
pl: E920, L-cysteina, Cysteina
pt: E920, L-cisteína, Cisteína
ro: E920, L-cisteină, Cisteină, Cisteina hidrolorică și sărurile ei de sodiu și potasiu
ru: E920, L-Цистеин
sh: E920, L-Cistein
sk: E920, L-cysteín, Cysteín
sl: E920, L-cistein, Cistein
sr: E920, L-Cistein
sv: E920, L-cystein, Cystein, E 910, Cysteiner
ta: E920, L-சிஸ்டீன்
tr: E920, L-Sistein
uk: E920, L-Цистеїн
vi: E920, L-Cystein

en: E921, L-cysteine hydrochloride monohydrate
xx: E921
ar: E921, مونوهيدرات هيدروكلوريد L-سيستين
az: E921, L-sistein hidroxlorid monohidrat
bg: E921, L-цистеин хидрохлорид монохидрат
ca: E921, Monohidrat d'hidroclorur de L-cisteïna
cs: E921, Monohydrát hydrochloridu L-cysteinu
da: E921, L-cystein hydrochlorid monohydrat
de: E921, L-Cystein-Hydrochlorid-Monohydrat
el: E921, Μονοϋδρική υδροχλωρική L-κυστεΐνη
es: E921, Monohidrato de hidrocloruro de L-cisteína
et: E921, L-tsüsteiinhüdrokloriidmonohüdraat
fi: E921, L-kystiini, L-kystiinia, L-kysteiinihydrokloridimonohydraatti
fr: E921, Cystine, Chlorhydrate de L-cystéine monohydraté
hu: E921, L-cisztein-hidroklorid-monohidrát
it: E921, Monoidrato di L-cisteina cloridrato
ja: E921, L-システイン塩酸塩一水和物
ko: E921, L-시스테인 염산염 일수화물
lt: E921, L-cisteino hidrochlorido monohidratas
lv: E921, L-cisteīna hidrohlorīda monohidrāts
nl: E921, L-Cystine, L-cysteïnehydrochloridemonohydraat
pl: E921, Monohydrat chlorowodorku L-cysteiny
pt: E921, Cloridrato de L-cisteína monohidratado
ro: E921, Cistina hidroclorică și sărurile ei de sodiu și potasiu, Clorhidrat de L-cisteină monohidrat
ru: E921, L-цистеина гидрохлорид моногидрат
sk: E921, Monohydrát hydrochloridu L-cysteínu
sl: E921, L-cisteinijev hidroklorid monohidrat
sv: E921, L-cystein hydrokloridmonohydrat
zh: E921, L-半胱氨酸盐酸盐一水合物

en: E922, Potassium persulfate
xx: E922
ar: E922, بيرسلفات البوتاسيوم
az: E922, Kalium persulfat
bg: E922, Калиев персулфат
ca: E922, Persulfat de potassi
cs: E922, Peroxodisíran draselný
da: E922, Kaliumpersulfat
de: E922, Kaliumperoxodisulfat, Dikaliumperoxodisulfat, Kaliumpersulfat, K2S2O8, Überschwefelsaures Kalium, E 922, Kalium persulfuricum
el: E922, Υπερσουλφικό κάλιο
eo: E922, Kalia persulfato
es: E922, Persulfato de potasio
et: E922, Kaaliumpersulfaat
fi: E922, Kaliumpersulfaatti, Kaliumperoksidisulfaatti, Kaliumperoksodisulfaatti, Kaliumpersulfaattia, Kaliumperoksidisulfaattia, Kaliumperoksodisulfaattia
fr: E922, Persulfate de potassium
he: E922, אשלגן פרסולפט
hi: E922, पोटेशियम परसल्फेट
hr: E922, Kalijev persulfat
hu: E922, Kálium-perszulfát, Kálium-peroxo-diszulfát
id: E922, Kalium persulfat
it: E922, Perossidisolfato di potassio, K2O8S2, Persolfato di potassio
ja: E922, 過硫酸カリウム
ko: E922, 과황산 칼륨
lt: E922, Kalio persulfatas
lv: E922, Kālija persulfāts
mk: E922, Калиум персулфат
mt: E922, Persulfat tal-potassju
nl: E922, Kaliumpersulfaat, Kaliumperoxodisulfaat
pl: E922, Nadsiarczan potasu
pt: E922, Persulfato de potássio
ro: E922, Persulfat de potasiu
ru: E922, Пероксодисульфат калия
sk: E922, Peroxodisíran draselný
sl: E922, Kalijev persulfat
sr: E922, Калијум персулфат
sv: E922, Kaliumpersulfat, Kaliumperoxodisulfat, Dikaliumperoxodisulfat
th: E922, โพแทสเซียมเปอร์ซัลเฟต
tr: E922, Potasyum persülfat
uk: E922, Персульфат калію
vi: E922, Kali persulfat
zh: E922, 过硫酸钾